Vermont, session 2025-2026, H638.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4813 is added to read:
§ 4813. RECOVERY RESIDENCE CERTIFICATION
(a) Definition. As used in this section, “recovery residence” means a
shared temporary living residence supporting persons recovering from a
substance use disorder that provides care through peer support and assistance
accessing support services and community resources available to persons
recovering from substance use disorders.
(b) Certification. Upon receipt of an application from a recovery residence
in the State seeking certification, the Department shall issue the requested
certification if it determines that the applicant meets the following minimum
standards:
(1) the applicant is certified by either a Vermont affiliate of the National
Alliance for Recovery Residences or another organization approved by the
Department;
(2) the applicant demonstrates the capacity to operate a recovery
residence in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Health and in
a manner that ensures person-centered care and resident dignity;
(3) the applicant shall fully comply with standards for health, safety, and
sanitation as required by State law, including standards set forth by the State
Fire Marshal, the Department, and municipal ordinance;
VT LEG #385254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.638
2026 Page 3 of 8
(4) the applicant agrees that once certified, the recovery residence,
including the buildings and grounds, shall be subject to inspections by the
Department with a 10-day prior notice;
(5) the applicant shall have a clear process for responding to resident
complaints, including:
(A) a method by which each resident shall be made aware of the
complaint procedure;
(B) an appeals mechanism within a recovery residence;
(C) a published time frame for processing and resolving complaints
and appeals within a recovery residence; and
(D) periodic reporting to the Department of the nature of complaints
filed and action taken; and
(6) the applicant shall fully comply with 9 V.S.A. chapter 137.
(c) Transferability. A certification is not transferable or assignable and
shall be issued only for the premises named in the application.
(d) Certification renewal. Annually, a recovery residence seeking renewal
of its certification under this section shall submit an attestation to the
Department that the recovery residence continues to maintain its certification
through either a Vermont affiliate of the National Alliance for Recovery
Residences or another organization approved by the Department.
VT LEG #385254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.638
2026 Page 4 of 8
(e) Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) Reporting.
(1) On or before January 1 of each year, a recovery residence certified
pursuant to this section shall report to the Department the following data from
the previous calendar year in a manner approved by the Department, in
consultation with the Vermont affiliate of the National Alliance for Recovery
Residences or another organization approved by the Department:
(A) the number of residents served;
(B) the average length of stay at the recovery residence;
(C) any exit or transfer of a resident by the recovery residence and
the asserted basis for exiting or transferring the resident;
(D) the number of residents who gained or lost meaningful
employment during their stay at the recovery residence;
(E) budgetary needs; and
(F) any other information the Department deems appropriate.
(2) On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall submit
the data received under subdivision (1) of this subsection in an aggregated
format to the House Committee on Human Services and the Senate Committee
on Health and Welfare.
VT LEG #385254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.638
2026 Page 5 of 8
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 4452 is amended to read:
§ 4452. EXCLUSIONS
(a) Unless created to avoid the application of this chapter, this chapter does
not apply to any of the following:
* * *
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsections 4463(b) and 4467(b) and section 4468
of this chapter only, a recovery residence may immediately exit or transfer a
resident if all of the following conditions are met:
(A) the recovery residence has developed and adopted a residential
agreement:
(i) containing a written exit and transfer policy approved by the
Vermont Alliance for Recovery Residences or another certifying organization
approved by the Department of Health that:
(I) addresses the length of time that a bed will be held in the
event of a temporary removal;
(II) establishes the criteria by which a resident can return to the
recovery residence in the event of a temporary removal; and
(III) ensures a resident’s possessions will be held not less than
60 days in the event of permanent removal;
(ii) explaining program rules and expected residential social
standards;
VT LEG #385254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.638
2026 Page 6 of 8
(iii) designating alternative housing arrangements for the resident
in the event of an exit or transfer, including contingency plans when alternative
housing arrangements are not available;
(iii)(iv) describing the recovery residence’s substance use policy,
which shall exempt the use of a resident’s valid prescription medication when
used as prescribed; and
(iv)(v) indicating that by signing a residential agreement, a
resident acknowledges that the recovery residence may cause the resident to be
immediately exited or transferred to alternative housing if the resident violates
the recovery residence’s substance use policy, regularly refuses to engage in
services or programming, commits a crime, engages in theft, is mentally or
physically interfering with the recovery of other residents, or engages in acts of
violence that threaten the health or safety of other residents or recovery
residence staff;
(B) the recovery residence has obtained the resident’s written consent
to its residential agreement, reaffirmed after seven days;
(C) the resident violated the substance use policy in the residential
agreement, regularly refused to engage in services or programming, committed
a crime, engaged in theft, was mentally or physically interfering with the
recovery of other residents, or engaged in acts of violence that threatened the
health or safety of other residents or recovery residence staff; and
VT LEG #385254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.638
2026 Page 7 of 8
(D) the recovery residence has provided or arranged for a
stabilization bed or other alternative temporary housing.
(2) Relapse of a substance use disorder resulting in exiting a recovery
residence shall not be deemed a cause of the resident’s own homelessness for
purposes of obtaining emergency housing.
(3) As used in this subsection, “recovery residence” means a shared
living residence supporting persons recovering from a substance use disorder
that:
(A) provides tenants with peer support and assistance accessing
support services and community resources available to persons recovering
from substance use disorders; and
(B) is certified by an organization approved by the Department of
Health and that is either a Vermont affiliate of the National Alliance for
Recovery Residences or another approved organization has the same meaning
as in 18 V.S.A. § 4812.
Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 163, Sec. 5 is amended to read:
Sec. 5. SUNSET; RECOVERY RESIDENCES; RESIDENTIAL
AGREEMENT; REPORTING
(a) 9 V.S.A. § 4452(b) is repealed on July 1, 2026. [Deleted.]
(b) Sec. 4 (report; recovery residences’ exit and transfer data) is repealed
on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.638
2026 Page 8 of 8
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385254 v.1